Utah statutes.
58-37f-102.   Definitions.

(1)  The definitions in Section 58-37-2 apply to this chapter.

(2)  As used in this chapter:

(a)  "Board" means the Utah State Board of Pharmacy created in Section 58-17b-201.

(b)  "Database" means the controlled substance database created in Section 58-37f-201.

(c)  "Health care facility" is as defined in Section 26-21-2.

(d)  "Mental health therapist" is as defined in Section 58-60-102.

(e)  "Pharmacy" or "pharmaceutical facility" is as defined in Section 58-17b-102.

(f)  "Prospective patient" means an individual who:

(i)  is seeking medical advice, medical treatment, or medical services from a practitioner; and

(ii)  the practitioner described in Subsection (2)(f)(i) is considering accepting as a patient.

(g)  "Substance abuse treatment program" is as defined in Section 62A-2-101.



Amended by Chapter 340, 2011 General Session

